src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_IE_SG_NOM
 +Nom:ie FINAL1 ;
 
 
 ! Se nærmere på disse Px-ene

LEXICON N_IE_SG_OBL
        +Nom+Uml+PxSg1:%>%^1UMLeme    FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLedh    FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+Uml+PxSg3:e%>se          FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+Uml+PxSg3:e%>be          FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+PxSg3:e%>be              FINAL1 ; ! korpus
                  +Acc:ie%>m          FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+Uml+PxSg1:%>%^1UMLeme    FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+Uml+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>%^1UMLemem   FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLemdh   FINAL1 ;
            +Acc+PxSg3:e%>mse         FINAL1 ;
            +Acc+PxSg3:e%>bem         FINAL1 ;
                  +Gen:ie%>n          FINAL1 ;
            +Gen+PxSg3:e%>ben         FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+Uml+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>%^1UMLene    FINAL1 ;
              +Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan     FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+Uml+PxSg1:%>%^1UMLasanne FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLasadth FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+Uml+PxSg3:iebasse        FINAL1 ;
                  +Ine:e%>sne         FINAL1 ;
                  +Ela:e%>ste         FINAL1 ;
            +Ela+PxSg1:ie%>stanne     FINAL1 ;
        +Ela+Uml+PxSg3:iebistie      FINAL1 ;
        +Ine+Uml+PxSg3:iebinie       FINAL1 ;
     +Ela+PxSg2+Use/NG:ie%>stadth     FINAL1 ;
                  +Com:%>ine          FINAL1 ;
        +Com+Uml+PxSg3:iebinie       FINAL1 ;
       +Com+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine    FINAL1 ;
        +Com+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLanadth FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_IE_SG_OBLadj
        +Nom+Uml+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLeme    FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+Uml+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLedh    FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+Uml+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>se          FINAL1 ;
                          +Acc:ie%>m          FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+Uml+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLeme    FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+Uml+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLemem   FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+Uml+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLemdh   FINAL1 ;
            +Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>mse         FINAL1 ;
                          +Gen:ie%>n          FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+Uml+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLene    FINAL1 ;
                      +Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan     FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+Uml+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLasanne FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+Uml+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLasadth FINAL1 ;
                          +Ine:e%>sne         FINAL1 ;
                          +Ela:e%>ste         FINAL1 ;
            +Ela+PxSg1+Err/Orth:ie%>stanne     FINAL1 ;
     +Ela+PxSg2+Err/Orth:ie%>stadth     FINAL1 ;
                          +Com:%>ine          FINAL1 ;
               +Com+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine    FINAL1 ;
        +Com+Uml+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>%^1UMLanadth FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_IE_PL
               +Nom:ie%>h            FINAL1 ;
         +Acc+NoUml:%>ide            FINAL1 ;
    +Acc+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide      FINAL1 ;
         +Gen+NoUml:ie%>j            FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+NoUml+Err/Orth:i%>j            FINAL1 ;
    +Gen+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLi        FINAL1 ;
         +Ill+NoUml:%>ide            FINAL1 ;
    +Ill+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide      FINAL1 ;
         +Ine+NoUml:%>ine            FINAL1 ;
    +Ine+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine      FINAL1 ;
         +Ela+NoUml:%>ijste          FINAL1 ;
    +Ela+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLijste    FINAL1 ;
         +Com+NoUml:ie%>jgujmie      FINAL1 ;
 +Com+NoUml+Err/Orth:i%>jgujmie      FINAL1 ;
   +Com+Uml+Err/Orth:%>%^iUMLigyjmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+NoUml+Err/Orth:ie%>jgyjmie     FINAL1 ;
    +Com+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLigujmie  FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_IE_ESS
      +Ess+NoUml:%>ine       FINAL1 ;
 +Ess+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine FINAL1 ;


!LEXICON N_IE_COMP ! a reference from the Adj.affix-file
!N_IE ;
!+N+Der/A:ie EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON TJULHPIE ! adverb
         :tjulhp     N_IE    ;
 +N+Der/A:tjulhpiehk ODDCOMP ;


! LEXICON TJIDTJIE
!          +N+Der1+Der/Rec+N:ie           LAAHKOEH_EVEN ;
!                      +N+Sg:             N_IE_SG       ;
!                      +N+Pl:             N_IE_PL       ;
!                         +N:             N_IE_ESS      ;
!                +N+Cmp/SgNom:ie           R             ;
!                +N+Cmp/SgGen:ie%>n        R             ;
!                +N+Cmp/PlGen:ie%>j        R             ;
!            +N+Cmp/PlGen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi    R             ;
!        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj GÅATETJE      ;
!    +N+Der1+Der/ijes+A+Attr:%»%^1UMLijes ATTR_0        ;
!  +N+Der1+Der/ijes+A+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLijes FINAL1        ;
!           +N+Der1+Der/ijes:%»%^1UMLij   ODDCOMP       ;

!LEXICON TJÅENIEH !ie plural lexicon
!               +N+Pl+Nom:ie%>h           FINAL1    ;
!         +N+Pl+Acc+NoUml:%>ide           FINAL1    ;
!    +N+Pl+Acc+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide     FINAL1    ;
!         +N+Pl+Gen+NoUml:ie%>j           FINAL1    ;
!    +N+Pl+Gen+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLi       FINAL1    ;
!         +N+Pl+Ill+NoUml:%>ide           FINAL1    ;
!    +N+Pl+Ill+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide     FINAL1    ;
!         +N+Pl+Ine+NoUml:%>ine           FINAL1    ;
!    +N+Pl+Ine+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1    ;
!         +N+Pl+Ela+NoUml:%>ijste         FINAL1    ;
!    +N+Pl+Ela+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLijste   FINAL1    ;
!         +N+Pl+Com+NoUml:ie%>jgujmie     FINAL1    ;
!   +N+Pl+Com+Uml+Err/Orth:%>%^iUMLigyjmie FINAL1   ;
! +N+Pl+Com+NoUml+Err/Orth:ie%>jgyjmie     FINAL1   ;
!    +N+Pl+Com+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLigujmie FINAL1    ;
!            +N+Ess+NoUml:%>ine           FINAL1    ;
!       +N+Ess+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1    ;
!             +N+Cmp/SgNom:ie              R        ;
!       +N+Cmp/PlGen+NoUml:ie%>j           R        ;
!         +N+Cmp/PlGen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi       R        ;
!  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%^aLATUS%»tj    N_ODD_PL  ;
!     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj    N_ODD_ESS ;


!! !!Inflection for nouns ending in oe
!    ---------------------------------


!! The oe with umlaut generate the uml-ones
!! and have the non-uml ones as +Use/NG.

LEXICON N_OE_UML
    +N+Sg+Nom:oe FINAL1           ;
 +N+Sg+Use/NG:   N_OE_SGILL_UML   ; ! Causes Umlaut
        +N+Sg:   N_OE_SGILL_NOUML ; ! Does not cause Umlaut, 
           +N:   N_OE_NO_ILL      ; ! gives the other cases


LEXICON N_OE_SGILL_UML
       +Ill+Uml:e%>%^2UMLse    FINAL1 ; ! Causes Umlaut
 +Ill+Uml+PxSg1:e%>%^2UMLsanne FINAL1 ;
 +Ill+Uml+PxSg2:e%>%^2UMLsadth FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_OE_SGILL_NOUML
 +Ill:o%>se FINAL1 ;


!! The oe without umlaut generate the non-uml-ones
!! only, naturally without +Use/NG.

LEXICON N_OE
 +N+Sg+Nom:oe FINAL1   ;
        +N:   N_OE_OBL ;

LEXICON N_OE_OBL
!! Lexicon @LEXNAME@ is for the -oe nouns without umlaut
!! Illative is lifted out in order to allow for Use/NG for the
!! umlauted ones.
 +Sg: N_OE_SGILL_NOUML ;
      N_OE_NO_ILL      ;

LEXICON N_OE_NO_ILL
               +Sg:            N_OE_SG  ;
               +Pl:            N_OE_PL  ;
                               N_OE_ESS ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:oe          R        ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:oe%>n       R        ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:oe%>j       R        ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»%^2UMLtj GÅATETJE ;
   +Der2+Der/Car:oht   hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;
