src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin ! 
neavroe+Sem/Dummytag:neavr N_OE_UML ; ! til px-lexicon
råantjoe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:råantj N_OE_UML ;
seangkoe+Sem/Dummytag:seangk N_OE_UML ;
skaavtjoe+Sem/Dummytag:skaavtj N_OE_UML ; ! til px-lexicon
sådtoe+Sem/Dummytag:sådt N_OE_UML ;
vaarjoe+Sem/Dummytag:vaarj N_OE_UML ;
vælloe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:væll N_OE_UML ; ! til px-lexiocn
væljoe+Sem/Dummytag:vælj N_OE_UML ; ! til px-lexicons
LEXICON NounPx ! 
njablemebearkoe:njablemebeark N_OE_UML ; !njeblie? = Njæblodh= ofte: bearkoe njobleme?
göölenåajjaråantjoe:göölenåajja#råantj N_OE_UML ;
gåaksoe+Sem/Dummytag:gåaks N_OE_UML ;
læjnoe+Sem/Dummytag:læjn N_OE_UML ;
faajsoe+Sem/Dummytag:faajs N_OE_UML ;
faajsoe+Sem/Dummytag:faajs N_OE_UML ;
aajroe+Sem/Dummytag:aajr N_OE_UML ;
aaloe+Sem/Dummytag:aal N_OE_UML ;
aassjoe+Sem/Dummytag:aassj N_OE_UML ;
aeredsbeapmoe+Sem/Dummytag:aereds#beapm N_OE_UML ;
baakoedaajroe+Sem/Dummytag:baakoe#daajr N_OE_UML ;
baartesvåhkoe+Sem/Dummytag:baartes#våhk N_OE_UML ;
pryövemebarkoe+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:pryövoe#bark N_OE_UML ;
barkoe+Sem/Dummytag:bark N_OE_UML ;
bearkoegaamsoe+Sem/Dummytag:bearkoe#gaams N_OE_UML ;
biejjievælloe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:biejjie#væll N_OE_UML ;
budsjehtebarkoe+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:budsjedte#bark N_OE_UML ;
byjjesfaamoe+Sem/Dummytag:byjjes#faam N_OE ;
båadoe+Sem/Dummytag:båad N_OE ;
båatsoe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:båats N_OE ;
båskoe+Sem/Dummytag:båsk N_OE_UML ;
bæjhpoe+Sem/Dummytag:bæjhp N_OE_UML ;
daabloe+Sem/Dummytag:daabl N_OE_UML ;
daaskoe+Sem/Dummytag:daask N_OE_UML ;
daatoe+Sem/Dummytag:daat N_OE ;
deajvoe+Sem/Dummytag:deajv N_OE_UML ;
doenaajmoe+Sem/Dummytag:doen#aajm N_OE_UML ;
dïjmemebearkoe+Sem/Dummytag:dïjmeme#beark N_OE ;
ealoe+Sem/Dummytag:eal N_OE_UML ;
eejhteghtjåanghkoe+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:eejhtegh#tjåahk N_OE ;
eejhteghtjåanghkoe+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:eejhteh#tjåahk N_OE ;
eejhteghtjåanghkoe+Sem/Dummytag:eejhtegh#tjåanghk N_OE ;
eejhtehtjåanghkoe+Sem/Dummytag:eejhteh#tjåanghk N_OE ;
faahtjoe+Sem/Dummytag:faahtj N_OE_UML ;
feavroe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:feavr N_OE_UML ;
fæjloe+Sem/Dummytag:fæjl N_OE_UML ;
gaajhroe+Sem/Dummytag:gaajhr N_OE_UML ;
gaaroe+Sem/Dummytag:gaar N_OE_UML ;
gaavmoe+Sem/Dummytag:gaavm N_OE_UML ;
gaavnedimmietjåanghkoe+Sem/Dummytag:gaavnedimmie#tjåanghk N_OE ;
gaskevåhkoe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gaske#våhk N_OE ;
gejhkiebearkoe+Sem/Dummytag:gejhkie#beark N_OE ;
gierehtsepleahtjoe+Sem/Dummytag:gierehtse#pleahtj N_OE ;
giesiebarkoe+Sem/Dummytag:giesie#bark N_OE_UML ;
gåbloe+Sem/Dummytag:gåbl N_OE_UML ;
gålkoemaanoe+Sem/Dummytag:gålkoe#maan N_OE ;
gæstoe+Sem/Dummytag:gæst N_OE_UML ;
gïeleåtnoe+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:gïele#åtn N_OE ;
haarmoe+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:haarm N_OE_UML "" ; ! håårmese
hammoe+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:hamm N_OE ;
håavkoe+Sem/Dummytag:håavk N_OE_UML ;
jaepietjåanghkoe+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:jaepie#tjåahk N_OE ;
jaepietjåanghkoe+Sem/Dummytag:jaepie#tjåanghk N_OE ;
jahkoe+Sem/Dummytag:jahk N_OE_UML ;
jïengedaanhtsoe+Sem/Dummytag:jïenge#daanhts N_OE_UML ;
kultuvreaerpielæstoe+Sem/Dummytag:kultuvre#aerpie#læst N_OE_UML ;
leajoe+Sem/Dummytag:leaj N_OE_UML ;
lijniegaalloe+Sem/Dummytag:lijnie#gaall N_OE_UML ;
löönemebaakoe+Sem/Dummytag:lööneme#baak N_OE_UML ;
meahkoe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:meahk N_OE_UML ;
målloe+Sem/Dummytag:måll N_OE_UML ;
njoeleaavtjoe+Sem/Dummytag:njoele#aavtj N_OE_UML ;
nyöjhkemehaamoe+Sem/Dummytag:nyöjhkeme#haam N_OE ;
plåktoe+Sem/Dummytag:plåkt N_OE_UML ;
reaktoe+Sem/Dummytag:reakt N_OE_UML ;
ruaksjabaahkoe+Sem/Dummytag:ruaksja#baahk N_OE ;
saemienlåhkoe+Sem/Dummytag:saemien#låhk N_OE_UML ;
skåalnjoe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:skåalnj N_OE_UML ;
skæltjaråavkoe+Sem/Dummytag:skæltja#råavk N_OE ;
slampoe+Sem/Dummytag:slamp N_OE_UML ;
sorhpebæhtoe+Sem/Dummytag:sorhpe#bæht N_OE_UML ;
stråamhpoe+Sem/Dummytag:stråamhp N_OE_UML ;
såangkoe+Sem/Dummytag:såangk N_OE_UML ;
tjahkebaahkoe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjahke#baahk N_OE ;
tjulhpie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag: TJULHPIE ;
tjåanghkoe+Sem/Dummytag:tjåanghk N_OE_UML ;
tsavnoe+Sem/Dummytag:tsavn N_OE_UML ;
unnebelåhkoe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:unnebe#låhk N_OE ;
klaerievåarhkoe+Sem/Dummytag:klaerie#våarhk N_OE_UML ;
vaatnoe+Sem/Dummytag:vaatn N_OE ; !LA
vualkoe+Sem/Dummytag:vualk N_OE_UML ;
våhkoetjåanghkoe+Sem/Dummytag:våhkoe#tjåanghk N_OE ;
væljoe+Sem/Dummytag:vælj N_OE ;
værsjoe+Sem/Dummytag:værsjoe N_OE ;
åhtoe+Sem/Dummytag:åht N_OE ;
gaaltijeåtnoe+Sem/Dummytag:gaaltije#åtn N_OE ;
laavenjostoe+Sem/Dummytag:laavenjost N_OE ; !samediggediedahus 2012
lïerehtimmielatjkoe+Sem/Dummytag:lïerehtimmie#latjk N_OE_UML ;
viermietjåahkoe+Sem/Dummytag:viermie#tjåahk N_OE ;
viermietjåahkoe+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:viermie#tjåanghk N_OE ;
aapoe+Sem/Dummytag:aap N_OE ; 
abjoe+Sem/Dummytag:abj N_OE ; 
bæssedsmaanoe:bæsseds#maan N_OE ;
maadthdåarjoe+Sem/Dummytag:maadth#dåarj N_OE ;
maadthmaahtoe+Sem/Dummytag:maadth#maaht N_OE_UML ;  ! maadth maahtoe
tariffelatjkoe+Sem/Dummytag:tariffe#latjk N_OE_UML ;
kasehtevåarhkoe+Sem/Dummytag:kasehtevåarhk N_OE_UML ; ! px-lexicon
